New York, session 2025-2026, A11657.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 16.36 to read as follows: 3 § 16.36 Self-direction funding adjustments. 4 1. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, rule or regu- 5 lation, the commissioner shall adjust all applicable funding limits 6 within the self-direction program administered by the office for people 7 with developmental disabilities, including but not limited to Other Than 8 Personal Services (OTPS), Family Reimbursed Respite (FRR), and all 9 subcategories within Individual Directed Goods and Services (IDGS), to 10 reflect cumulative cost-of-living adjustments enacted in state budgets 11 since January first, two thousand twenty. Such adjustments shall be 12 completed no later than April first, two thousand twenty-seven. 13 2. The following minimum funding floors shall apply upon the effective 14 date of this section and shall not be reduced by the commissioner or by 15 regulation: 16 (a) Other Than Personal Services (OTPS): not less than three thousand 17 five hundred dollars per plan year; 18 (b) Family Reimbursed Respite (FRR): not less than three thousand five 19 hundred dollars per plan year; 20 (c) IDGS Health Club and Organizational Memberships subcategory: not 21 less than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars per plan year; 22 (d) IDGS Camp subcategory: not less than four thousand seven hundred 23 dollars per plan year; and 24 (e) IDGS Coaching and Education for Parent, Spouse, or Advocate 25 subcategory: not less than five hundred eighty-five dollars per plan 26 year. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15848-01-6 A. 11657 2 1 3. Beginning April first, two thousand twenty-seven, and on the first 2 day of each subsequent state fiscal year, the commissioner shall adjust 3 all funding limits and subcategory caps set forth in subdivision two of 4 this section based on the human services cost-of-living adjustment 5 included in the enacted state budget for that fiscal year. Such annual 6 adjustment is mandatory and shall be applied without further legislative 7 action. The commissioner shall not apply any annual adjustment that 8 would reduce a funding limit below the floors established in subdivision 9 two of this section. 10 4. The commissioner shall publish updated funding limits and the meth- 11 odology used for each annual adjustment no later than thirty days prior 12 to the beginning of each state fiscal year. Failure to publish shall not 13 stay the effectiveness of the required adjustment. 14 5. The commissioner shall be subject to administrative oversight and 15 compliance review by the legislature, the state comptroller, and the 16 division of the budget with respect to the adjustments required under 17 this section. Any individual enrolled in the self-direction program who 18 is adversely affected by a failure to implement the required adjustments 19 may file a complaint with the office of the Medicaid inspector general 20 or seek administrative review pursuant to applicable procedures under 21 this chapter. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027. Effective immediately, 23 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 24 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 25 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.